Arkansas, session 2025, SB403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The United States Bureau of the Census is required by the
United States Constitution to conduct a federal decennial census;
(2) The federal decennial census provides a historic opportunity
to help shape the foundation of our society and plays an active role in
American democracy;
(3) An accurate federal decennial census is essential for the
redistricting of state legislative and congressional district boundaries;
(4) Important federal and state appropriation decisions are made
based in part on federal decennial census data;
*LGL078*
03-13-2025 14:03:16 LGL078

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 SB403
(5) Accurate federal decennial census information is critical to
planning for the growth, development, and social needs of Arkansas;
(6) The United States Bureau of the Census announced in 2022
that Arkansas had the highest undercount rate of the 2020 Federal Decennial
Census at five and four hundredths percent (5.04%);
(7) Arkansas was one (1) of six (6) states considered by the
United States Bureau of the Census to have a statistically significant
undercount during the 2020 Federal Decennial Census;
(8) Over three hundred (300) federal programs rely on federal
decennial census data to allocate funds;
(9) The George Washington Institute of Public Policy estimates
that fifty-five (55) large federal spending programs allocated nearly ten
billion dollars ($10,000,000,000) to Arkansas in the fiscal year 2016 based
on data derived from the 2010 Federal Decennial Census;
(10) Arkansas is estimated to lose five billion two hundred
fifty million dollars ($5,250,000,000) in federal funds by the end of the
2030 because of the 2020 Federal Decennial Census undercount rate;
(11) The 2020 Federal Decennial Census undercount rate of
children in Arkansas between the ages of zero (0) and four (4) was five and
fourteen hundredths percent (5.14%); and
(12) An undercount of young children results in fewer federal
funds allocated to Arkansas programs important to young children such as the
Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children
(WIC).

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. 2030 Arkansas Complete
Count Committee — Creation — Members — Proceedings — Duties.
(a) There is created the 2030 Arkansas Complete Count Committee.
(b) The committee shall consist of the following thirty (30) members:
(1) One (1) staff member of the office of the Governor to be
appointed by the Governor;
(2) Two (2) members appointed from the state at large by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(3) Two (2) members appointed from the state at large by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(4) The Secretary of the Department of Commerce or his or her
03-13-2025 14:03:16 LGL078

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 SB403
designee;
(5) The Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing or
his or her designee;
(6) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration or his or her designee;
(7) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services or his or
her designee;
(8) The Secretary of the Department of Health or his or her
designee;
(9) The Secretary of the Department of Education or his or her
designee;
(10) The Secretary of the Department of Veterans Affairs or his
or her designee;
(11) One (1) member who is a representative from the Arkansas
State Chamber of Commerce to be appointed by the Governor;
(12) Three (3) members who are representatives of city and
county governments to be appointed by the Governor;
(13) Two (2) members who are representatives of local community
action agencies to be appointed by the Governor;
(14) One (1) member who is a representative of an area agency on
aging to be appointed by the Governor;
(15) Two (2) members who are representatives of the faith
community to be appointed by the Governor;
(16) One (1) faculty member from a state-funded institution of
higher education with a doctorate degree in demography, population studies,
statistics, social sciences, or a related field to be appointed by the
Governor;
(17) One (1) member from the state at large to be appointed by
the Governor; and
(18) Seven (7) members appointed by the Governor from nonprofit
organizations representing or serving historically undercounted populations
in the federal decennial census such as young children.
(c) Vacancies on the committee due to death, resignation, or other
causes shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired portion of the term
in the same manner as is provided in this section for initial appointments.
(d) Members of the committee shall serve without pay.
03-13-2025 14:03:16 LGL078

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 SB403
(e)(1) The Governor shall designate one (1) member of the committee as
chair.
(2) The chair shall call the first meeting of the committee.
(3) The first meeting shall occur within ninety (90) days of the
effective date of this act.
(4) The committee may conduct a meeting through electronic
means, including without limitation by:
(A) Telephone;
(B) Video conference; or
(C) Video broadcast.
(5)(A) The committee shall meet at least one (1) time every
other month.
(B) Additional meetings may be held upon the call of the
chair.
(f) The committee shall establish rules of procedure for meetings.
(g)(1) Fifteen (15) members of the committee shall constitute a quorum
for the transaction of business.
(2) The affirmative vote of a majority of members present is
required to adopt a motion or committee action.
(h) The committee shall advise and assist state agencies and private
nonprofit organizations to obtain the most accurate and complete population
count for the 2030 Federal Decennial Census.
(i) The committee shall:
(1) Work with the office of the Governor and the United States
Bureau of the Census to form strategies and techniques to increase the state
response rate for the 2030 Federal Decennial Census;
(2) Work with state agencies to plan and implement statewide
educational and outreach initiatives for the federal decennial census;
(3) Analyze the potential causes of the state undercount in the
2020 Federal Decennial Census to plan for the 2030 Federal Decennial Census;
(4) Request input from nonprofit entities and business leaders
on how the state can partner with the private sector for the purpose of
federal decennial census outreach;
(5) Collect information from state agencies concerning:
(A) An opportunity to integrate federal decennial census
outreach into current state agency activities; and
03-13-2025 14:03:16 LGL078

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 SB403
(B) The estimated funding necessary to add federal
decennial census outreach to current state agency activities; and
(6) Recommend appropriations for 2030 Federal Decennial Census
outreach.
(j) The committee shall provide a written report of findings and
recommendations concerning 2030 Federal Decennial Census outreach to the
Governor and the Legislative Council on or before September 1, 2026.
(k) The committee shall continue to meet until September 1, 2030, to:
(1) Assess the progress of federal decennial census outreach;
and
(2) Develop outreach recommendations for the 2040 Federal
Decennial Census.
(l) The committee shall provide a written report of findings and
recommendations concerning 2040 Federal Decennial Census outreach to the
Governor and the Legislative Council on or before September 1, 2030.
(m) The committee shall expire on September 30, 2030.

/s/C. Tucker


















03-13-2025 14:03:16 LGL078